Hawaii, session 2026, SB2859.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF HAWAII: SECTION 1.  Chapter 346, Hawaii Revised Statutes, is amended by adding a new section to part II to be appropriately designated and to read as follows: "§346-     State-funded assistance for colorectal cancer screenings.  (a) The department shall provide state‑funded financial assistance, as appropriated by the legislature, to pay for colorectal cancer screenings for residents of the State who: (1)  Are uninsured; (2)  Have health care coverage that does not provide coverage without cost sharing for colorectal cancer screenings that meet the requirements of sections 431:10A-122 and 432:1-617; (3)  Are permanent United States resident aliens but are ineligible for medicaid; or (4)  Are nonresident aliens and are ineligible for medicaid. (b)  The state-funded colorectal cancer screenings shall meet the requirements of sections 431:10A-122 and 432:1-617." SECTION 2.  Section 431:10A-122, Hawaii Revised Statutes, is amended to read as follows: "[[]§431:10A-122[]  Colon] Colorectal cancer screening coverage.  (a)  Each policy of accident and health or sickness insurance providing coverage for health care, except for policies that only provide coverage for specified diseases or other limited benefit coverage, shall provide coverage for [colorectal-cancer] colorectal cancer screening by all A and B grade screening modalities as recommended by the United States Preventive Services Task Force. (b)  For purposes of this section, all coverage for colorectal cancer screenings shall be consistent with the Affordable Care Act implementation frequently asked questions published by the United States Department of Labor, United States Department of Health and Human Services, and United States Department of the Treasury. [(b)] (c)  Beginning March 1, 2011, all health insurance providers in Hawaii shall inform their insured about the risk associated with undiagnosed [colorectal-cancer] colorectal cancer and encourage the insured to consult with the insured's physician about available screening options." SECTION 3.  Section 432:1-617, Hawaii Revised Statutes, is amended to read as follows: "[[]§432:1-617[]  Colon] Colorectal cancer screening coverage.  (a)  All individual and group hospital and medical service contracts providing health care coverage shall provide coverage for [colorectal-cancer] colorectal cancer screening by all A and B grade screening modalities as recommended by the United States Preventive Services Task Force. (b)  For purposes of this section, all coverage for colorectal cancer screenings shall be consistent with the Affordable Care Act implementation frequently asked questions published by the United States Department of Labor, United States Department of Health and Human Services, and United States Department of the Treasury. [(b)] (c)  Beginning March 1, 2011, all health insurance providers in Hawaii shall inform their insured of the risk associated with undiagnosed colorectal cancer and encourage the insured to consult with the insured's physician about available screening options." SECTION 4.  (a) The department of human services shall adopt rules pursuant to chapter 91, Hawaii Revised Statutes, to implement section 1 of this Act, including rules establishing an application process for state-funded colorectal cancer screenings. (b)  In adopting rules pursuant to this Act, the department shall ensure that: (1)  The state-funded colorectal cancer screenings meet the requirements of sections 431:10A-122 and 432:1-617, Hawaii Revised Statutes; and (2)  No cost-sharing requirements are imposed. SECTION 5.  There is appropriated out of the general revenues of the State of Hawaii the sum of $           or so much thereof as may be necessary for fiscal year 2026-2027 for the department of human services to develop and implement a public assistance program offering state-funded colorectal cancer screenings. The sum appropriated shall be expended by the department of human services for the purposes of this Act. SECTION 6.  Statutory material to be repealed is bracketed and stricken.  New statutory material is underscored. SECTION 7.  This Act shall take effect on July 1, 2026. INTRODUCED BY: _____________________________